Maryland, session 2025, HB1393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
14–501.
(a) [(1)] In this [section] SUBTITLE the following words have the meanings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1393*

HOUSE BILL 1393
indicated.
[(2)] (B) “Concussion” means a traumatic injury to the brain causing an
immediate and, usually, short–lived change in mental status or an alteration of normal
consciousness resulting from:
[(i)] (1) A fall;
[(ii)] (2) A violent blow to the head or body; [or]
[(iii)] (3) The shaking or spinning of the head or body; OR
(4) ANY TYPE OF DIRECT OR INDIRECT HIT TO THE HEAD OR BODY.
[(3)] (C) “Sudden cardiac arrest” means a condition in which the heart
suddenly and unexpectedly stops beating.
[(4)] (D) “Youth athlete” means an individual who participates in an
athletic activity in association with a youth sports program conducted:
[(i)] (1) At a public OR PRIVATE school facility; or
[(ii)] (2) By a recreational athletic organization.
[(5)] (E) “Youth sports program” means a program organized for
recreational athletic competition or instruction for participants who are under the age of
19 years.
14–502.
[(b)] (A) (1) A youth sports program shall make available information on
concussions, head injuries, and sudden cardiac arrest developed by the State Department
of Education under §§ 7–433 and 7–436 of the Education Article to coaches, youth athletes,
and the parents or guardians of youth athletes.
(2) A coach of a youth sports program shall review the information provided
in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
[(c)] (B) (1) A youth athlete who is suspected of sustaining a concussion or
other head injury in a practice or game shall be removed from play at that time.
(2) A youth athlete who has been removed from play may not return to play
until the youth athlete has obtained written clearance from a licensed health care provider
trained in the evaluation and management of concussions.
[(d)] (C) Before a youth sports program may use a facility owned or operated by

HOUSE BILL 1393 3
a local government, the local government shall provide notice to the youth sports program
of the requirements of this section.
14–503.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM PERSONNEL” MEANS ANY
PAID OR VOLUNTEER COACH, OFFICIAL, ATHLETIC TRAINER, TEAM
ADMINISTRATOR, OR STAFF MEMBER WHO PARTICIPATES IN A YOUTH SPORTS
PROGRAM.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM BELOW
THE HIGH SCHOOL LEVEL OF PLAY.
(C) (1) A YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM SHALL MAINTAIN AND ANNUALLY
UPDATE A REGISTRY OF THE YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM PERSONNEL WHO
PARTICIPATE IN THE YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM.
(2) THE REGISTRY SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE FOR EACH
INDIVIDUAL:
(I) A VALID PHOTO IDENTIFICATION;
(II) A SCREENING THAT IS EITHER:
1. A COMPLETED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–551 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE; OR
2. A COMMERCIAL SCREENING THAT:
A. PROVIDES THE INDIVIDUAL’S NAME, DATE OF BIRTH,
AND CURRENT RESIDENCE, VERIFIED WITH A STATE–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION;
B. INCLUDES A NATIONWIDE CRIMINAL RECORD AND
SEX OFFENDER REGISTRY SEARCH; AND
C. INCLUDES AT LEAST ONE COUNTY CRIMINAL RECORD
SEARCH;
(III) A SIGNED ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF RECEIPT AND
UNDERSTANDING OF THE POLICIES AND PROTOCOLS OF THE YOUTH SPORTS
PROGRAM ON SAFETY PRIORITIES TO MINIMIZE RISK OF HARM TO YOUTH ATHLETES,
INCLUDING REMOVAL AND RETURN–TO–PLAY POLICIES; AND

HOUSE BILL 1393
(IV) DOCUMENTATION OF COMPLETION OF ANNUAL TRAINING
IN:
1. HEAT ILLNESS RECOGNITION, PREVENTION, AND
TREATMENT;
2. CONCUSSION AWARENESS;
3. CHILD SAFETY; AND
4. LEVELS OF CONTACT TRAINING CONSISTENT WITH
BEST PRACTICES.
(3) YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM PERSONNEL SHALL COMPLETE OR
RENEW A REGISTRATION WITH A YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM EACH YEAR BEFORE
PARTICIPATING IN ANY ATHLETIC EVENT OR ACTIVITY.
(4) (I) YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM PERSONNEL SHALL DISPLAY
PROOF OF REGISTRATION WITH THE YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM TO GAIN ENTRY INTO
THE ARENA OF PLAY FOR ANY ATHLETIC EVENT, PRACTICE, OR GAME.
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL’S PROOF OF REGISTRATION SHALL BE:
1. DISPLAYED FOR THE DURATION OF THE ATHLETIC
EVENT, PRACTICE, OR GAME; AND
2. ON REQUEST, AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION.
(D) (1) A YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE TO EACH PARENT OR
GUARDIAN WHO REGISTERS A YOUTH ATHLETE IN THE YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM:
(I) INFORMATION ON:
1. SPORTS–RELATED HEAD INJURIES;
2. TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY IN CHILDREN;
3. YOUTH SPORTS AND HEAT ILLNESS, INCLUDING
DEHYDRATION; AND
4. REMOVAL AND RETURN–TO–PLAY POLICIES OF THE
YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM; AND

HOUSE BILL 1393 5
(II) A NOTICE THAT SPECIFIES THE POTENTIAL FOR:
1. BRAIN INJURY DURING ANY ATHLETIC EVENT,
PRACTICE, GAME, OR ACTIVITY; AND
2. HEAT–RELATED ILLNESSES FOR AN ATHLETIC EVENT
OR ACTIVITY PLAYED OUTDOORS DURING THE SUMMER MONTHS.
(2) THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A YOUTH ATHLETE REGISTERED
WITH A YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM SHALL SIGN AND SUBMIT TO THE YOUTH SPORTS
PROGRAM AN ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF RECEIPT OF THE INFORMATION REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) A YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF ITS
REMOVAL AND RETURN–TO–PLAY POLICY, ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 14–502 OF THIS SUBTITLE, TO:
(I) ALL YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM PERSONNEL; AND
(II) EACH PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A REGISTERED YOUTH
ATHLETE.
(2) A YOUTH SPORTS PROGRAM SHALL POST ITS REMOVAL AND
RETURN–TO–PLAY POLICY ON ITS WEBSITE, IF AVAILABLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.